Utah statutes.
48-2a-503.   Sharing of profits and losses.

The profits and losses of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners, and among classes of partners, in the manner provided in writing in the partnership agreement.  If the partnership agreement does not provide in writing, profits, and losses shall be allocated on the basis of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to Section 48-2a-105, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

